District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1972

Temporary employees.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 528, ch. 569, title IV, § 9
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1600, Pub. L. 89-810, title II, § 202(6)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 11, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1134.
1973 Ed., § 31-1534.